Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256C.025, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Definitiondeleted text end new text begin Definitionsnew text end . new text begin (a) "Homeowners association" means a common interest community as defined in section 515B.1-103, regardless of whether the common interest community is subject to chapter 515B, or a residential community that is not a common interest community. new text end new text begin (b) new text end "Housing accommodations" means any real property, or portion thereof, which is used or occupied or is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home, residence or sleeping place of one or more human beings, but shall not include any single family residence the occupants of which rent, lease, or furnish for compensation not more than one room therein. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256C.025, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Service dog in training. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, a "service dog in training" means a dog that is being actively trained as a service dog under the supervision of an organization accredited by Assistance Dogs International or the International Guide Dog Federation to train service dogs. new text end new text begin (b) A person who is actively training a service dog in training is entitled to full and equal access to all housing accommodations provided for in this section. A person who is actively training a service dog in training must not be required to pay extra compensation for the service dog in training but is liable for any damage done to the premises by the service dog in training. new text end new text begin (c) A landlord or board of a homeowners association may require written certification from the organization supervising the training as a condition of granting an accommodation to a person training a service dog in training. An accommodation granted under this subdivision terminates upon completion of the training. new text end